Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Chapter 5 Oil and Gas

Cross references. —

As to duty of legislature to enact laws for development, ventilation, drainage and operation of mines and oil wells, see art. 9, § 2, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to taxation of mines and mining claims, see art. 15, § 3, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to mineral excise tax, see art. 15, § 19, Wyo. Const.

As to right of eminent domain with reference to petroleum or other pipelines, see §§

1-26-814

and

1-26-815

.

As to liens in connection with mines and oil wells generally, see §§

29-3-101

to

29-3-111

.

For provision that no covenant shall be implied in any conveyance of real estate other than a conveyance of oil, gas or other minerals, see §

34-1-135

.

As to oil and gas leases of public lands, both state and local, generally, see §§

36-6-101

to

36-6-204

.

As to authority of oil and gas companies with reference to rights-of-way over lands of state institutions, see §

37-9-204

.

As to interference or tampering with petroleum wells or pipelines, see §

37-12-119

.

As to taxation of oil and gas products, see §§

39-14-101

to

39-14-711

.

Purpose of Oil and Gas Conservation Act. —

The purpose of the Oil and Gas Conservation Act is to provide a comprehensive regulatory program which prevents the waste of Wyoming's oil and gas resources and protects the correlative rights of property owners. The act, therefore, represents a legislative modification to the rule of capture. Union Pac. Resources Co. v. Texaco, 882 P.2d 212,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Nov. 1, 1994).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Constitutionality of Wyoming's Oil and Gas Compulsory Pooling Provision,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 300.

For article on the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Act, §§

30-5-101

For note, “Creation of Royalties Prior to Leasing,” see 13 Wyo. L.J. 244 (1959).

For article, “Separate Views of John Kenneth Galbraith — Interim Report of the Oil Shale Advisory Board,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 51 (1967).

For article, “Oil Shale — The Need for a National Policy,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 61 (1967).

For article, “Lender Recoupment for Oil Not in Place,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1968).

For comment, “The Federal Reserved Water Doctrine — Application to the Problem of Water for Oil Shale Development,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 75 (1968).

For comment, “Non-Exclusive Rights of Lessees to Conduct Geophysical Exploration — Federal and Wyoming State Oil and Gas Leases,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 103 (1968).

For article, “Protection of Correlative Rights in Wyoming,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 363 (1968).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Unitization Statute,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 537 (1971).

For comment, “Secondary Recovery of Oil and Gas — The Rule of Positive Dominion,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 457 (1974).

For article, “Practice Before the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 353 (1975).

For case note, “Administrative Law—Broader Jurisdiction for the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Gas and Oil § 1 et seq.

“Royalty” on oil or gas production within language of conveyance, exception or reservation, what constitutes, 4 ALR2d 492.

Mistake, accident, inadvertence, etc., as ground for relief from termination or forfeiture of oil or gas lease for failure to complete well, commence drilling or pay rental strictly on time, 5 ALR2d 993.

“Net operating loss,” deduction for depletion under provision of Internal Revenue Code relating to “net operating loss” and its carry-back and carry-over, 9 ALR2d 330.

Abandonment of oil or gas lease by parol declaration, 13 ALR2d 951.

Tenant for life or for years and remaindermen, rights inter se in royalties or rents under oil, gas, coal or other mineral lease, 18 ALR2d 98.

Liability for injury to property occasioned by oil, water or the like flowing from well, 19 ALR2d 1025.

Oil and gas tanks, pipes and pipelines, and apparatus and accessories thereof as constituting attractive nuisance, 23 ALR2d 1157.

Necessity that mortgage covering oil and gas lease be recorded as real-estate mortgage, and/or filed or recorded as chattel mortgage, 34 ALR2d 902.

Compulsory pooling or unitization statute or ordinance requiring owners or lessees of oil and gas lands to develop their holdings as a single drilling unit and the like, validity of, 37 ALR2d 434.

Elements and measure of compensation for oil or gas pipeline through private property, 38 ALR2d 788.

Perpetual nonparticipating royalty interest in oil and gas as violating rule against perpetuities, 46 ALR2d 1268.

Duty of oil or gas lessee to restore surface of leased premises, 65 ALR2d 1356.

Employment in connection with oil or gas well drilling, as within Federal Fair Labor Standards Act, 66 ALR2d 1155.

Duty of lessee or assignee of oil or gas lease as regards marketing or delivery for marketing of oil and gas discovered, 71 ALR2d 1219.

Expenses and taxes deductible by lessee in computing lessor's oil and gas royalty or other return, 73 ALR2d 1056.

Right of lessor to cancel oil or gas lease for breach of implied obligation to explore and develop further after initial discovery of oil or gas, in absence of showing reasonable expectation of profit to lessee from further drilling, 79 ALR2d 792.

Oil refinery as nuisance, 86 ALR2d 1322.

Estoppel of oil and gas lessee to deny lessor's title, 87 ALR2d 602.

Rights and liabilities with respect to natural gas reduced to possession and subsequently stored in natural reservoir, 94 ALR2d 543.

Development or operation for oil or gas within terms of habendum clause extending primary term while the premises are being “developed or operated,” 96 ALR2d 322.

“Shut-in royalty” payment provisions in oil and gas leases, 96 ALR2d 345.

Rights of parties to oil and gas lease or royalty deed after expiration of fixed term where production temporarily ceases, 100 ALR2d 885.

Right and measure of recovery for breach of obligation to drill exploratory oil or gas wells, 4 ALR3d 284.

Validity of prohibition or regulation of removal or exploitation of oil, minerals, soil, sand, gravel, stone or other natural products within municipal limits, 10 ALR3d 1226.

“Dry hole” as “well” within undertaking to drill well, 15 ALR3d 450.

Construction of oil and gas lease as to the lessee's right and duty of geophysical or seismograph exploration or survey, 28 ALR3d 1426.

Liability of one maintaining pipeline for transportation of gas or other dangerous substances for injury or property damage sustained by one using surface, 30 ALR3d 685.

Liability in connection with fire or explosion incident to bulk storage, transportation, delivery, loading or unloading of petroleum products, 32 ALR3d 1169.

Rights, under oil and gas lease, deed or sales contract, to “distillate,” “condensate” or “natural gasoline,” 38 ALR3d 983.

Meaning of “paying quantities” in oil and gas lease, 43 ALR3d 8.

Validity, construction and application of entirety clause in gas and oil lease, 48 ALR3d 706.

Duty and liability as to plugging oil or gas well abandoned or taken out of production, 50 ALR3d 240.

Liability of oil and gas lessee or operator for injuries to or death of livestock, 51 ALR3d 304.

What constitutes reasonably necessary use of the surface of the leasehold by a mineral owner, lessee or driller under an oil and gas lease or drilling contract, 53 ALR3d 16.

Right to partition of overriding royalty interest in oil and gas leasehold, 58 ALR3d 1052.

Assertion of statutory mechanic's or materialman's lien against oil and gas produced or against proceeds attributable to oil and gas sold, 59 ALR3d 278.

Grant, lease, exception or reservation of oil and/or gas rights as including oil shale, 61 ALR3d 1109.

Validity and construction of statutes providing for reversion of mineral estates for abandonment or nonuse, 16 ALR4th 1029.

Implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 14.

Remedy for breach of implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 147.

Rights and obligations, with respect to adjoining landowners, arising out of secondary recovery of gas, oil, and other fluid minerals, 19 ALR4th 1182.

Production on one tract as extending term on other tract where one mineral lease conveys oil or gas rights in separate tracts for as long as oil or gas is produced, 35 ALR4th 1167.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals § 177.